District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.05

Compensation.

(a)

Each member of the Ethics Board, excluding the Chairman, shall receive compensation, as provided in § 1-611.08, while actually in the service of the Ethics Board, for a sum not to exceed $12,500 per annum.

(b)

The Chairman of the Ethics Board shall receive compensation, as provided in § 1-611.08, while actually in the service of the Ethics Board, for a sum not to exceed $26,500 per annum.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 205, 59 DCR 1862

History